Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201268-622
Referendum; persons eligible to vote;
Governor; powers.

(1) All employees of the State of Nebraska
or any political subdivision thereof or any instrumentality jointly created
by this state and any other state or states who have heretofore been excluded
from receiving or qualifying for benefits under Title II of the Social Security
Act because of membership in a retirement system may, when sections 68-621
to 68-630 have been complied with, vote at a referendum upon the question
of whether service in positions covered by such retirement system should be
excluded from or included under the state agreement, except that if such a
referendum has been conducted and certified in accordance with section 218(d)(3)
of the Social Security Act, as amended in 1954, prior to May 18, 1955, then
no further referendum shall be required, but this shall not prohibit the conducting
of such further referendum.

(2) The Governor may authorize a referendum and designate any agency
or individual to supervise its conduct, in accordance with the requirements
of section 218(d)(3) of the Social Security Act, on the question of whether
service in positions covered by a retirement system established by the state
or by a political subdivision thereof should be excluded from or included
under an agreement under sections 68-601 to 68-631.

Laws 1955, c. 264, § 16, p. 822;

Laws 1990, LB 820, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB684, § 10.